Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 3. Transaction of Business.

Sec. 10.13.170.
Offices.

A licensee shall maintain at least one office in this state.

A licensee may not maintain an office outside this state.

The location of each office of a licensee must be reasonably accessible to the public.

A licensee shall post in a conspicuous place at each of the licensee’s offices a sign that bears the corporate name of the licensee.

If a licensee establishes, relocates, or closes an office, the licensee shall give the department written notice within 30 days of the event.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.180.
Business of licensee.

A licensee may not engage in a business other than providing financing assistance and management assistance to businesses.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.190.
General powers.

In addition to the other powers given by this chapter and the powers conferred on the licensee by the laws under which it is incorporated that are not inconsistent with this chapter, a licensee may

borrow money and otherwise incur indebtedness for the licensee’s purposes, including the issuing of corporate bonds, debentures, notes, and other evidence of indebtedness; a licensee’s indebtedness may be secured or unsecured, and may involve equity features, including provisions for conversion to stock and warrants to purchase stock;

make contracts;

incur and pay necessary and incidental operating expenses;

purchase, receive, hold, lease, acquire, sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise acquire or dispose of real or personal property, and the rights and privileges that are incidental and appurtenant to the transactions, if the real or personal property is for the licensee’s use in operating the licensee’s business or if the real or personal property is acquired by the licensee from time to time in satisfaction of debts or the enforcement of obligations;

make donations for charitable, educational, research, or similar purposes;

provide financing assistance and management assistance to businesses and establish the terms and conditions of the assistance;

implement a reasonable and prudent policy for conserving and investing the licensee’s money before the money is used to provide financing assistance to businesses or to pay the expenses of the licensee;

exercise the incidental powers that are necessary, convenient, or reasonably related to providing financing assistance and management assistance to businesses.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.200.
Financing assistance form, terms, and conditions.

A licensee may determine the form, terms, and conditions for the financing assistance that it will provide.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.210.
Financing assistance allowed.

The financing assistance that a licensee may provide includes

loans;

purchase of debt instruments;

straight equity investments including the purchase of common stock or preferred stock;

debt with equity features including warrants to purchase stock, convertible debentures, or receipt of a percent of net income or sales;

royalty-based financing;

debt guarantees;

property leasing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.220.
Participation in governmental programs.

A licensee may participate in a federal, state, or local government program for which the licensee is eligible and that has as the program’s function the provision or facilitation of financing assistance or management assistance to businesses.

If a licensee participates in a program referred to in (a) of this section, the licensee shall comply with the requirements of the program.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.230.
Scope of management assistance.

When providing management assistance, a licensee may provide management advice, management services, technical advice, and technical services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.240.
Limitation to purposes of business.

Financing assistance and management assistance provided by a licensee to a business may only be for the business purposes of the business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.250.
Holding control of another business generally.

A licensee may not hold control of another business, except as provided under AS

10.13.260

—

10.13.280

. In this section, “licensee” includes the licensee in concert with a director, officer, controlling person, or affiliate of the licensee.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.260.
Control of assisted business.

A licensee that has provided financing assistance to a business may acquire and hold control of the business to the extent it becomes necessary to protect the licensee’s interest as a creditor of, or investor in, the business.

Unless the department approves a longer period, a licensee holding control of a business under this section shall divest itself of the control as soon as practicable, or within five years after acquiring the interest, whichever is sooner.

Within 30 days after a licensee exercises its authority to acquire and hold control of a business under this section, the licensee shall notify the department of the action. The notification must include the reasons why it is necessary for the licensee to acquire and hold control of the business and the length of time the licensee anticipates that it may be necessary to hold control of the business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.270.
Control of business providing financing assistance and management assistance.

With the approval of the department, a licensee may acquire and hold control of another business that is engaged only in the business of providing financing assistance and management assistance to businesses.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.280.
Department approval to hold control of other businesses.

With the approval of the department, a licensee may acquire and hold control of a business not otherwise allowed under AS

10.13.250

—

10.13.270

.

The department may not approve an application under (a) of this section unless the department determines that

the acquisition and control will not cause the amount of the licensee’s investments in businesses covered by this section to exceed 15 percent of the assets of the licensee; and

in the department’s judgment the approval will promote the purposes of this chapter.

An approval under (a) of this section may not be for a period of more than three years, unless the department determines that a longer period is necessary and consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.285.
“Hold control” defined.

In AS

10.13.250

—

10.13.280

, “hold control” means to directly or indirectly own, of record or beneficially, 50 percent or more of a business’s outstanding voting equity interests.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.290.
Business practice standards and reserves.

A licensee shall transact its business in a safe and sound manner and shall maintain itself in a safe and sound condition.

In determining whether a licensee is transacting business in a safe and sound manner, the department may not consider the risk of providing financing assistance to a business, unless the department determines that the risk is great enough to demonstrate gross mismanagement when compared with the return that can be realistically expected.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the department may

if the amount of the financing assistance is unduly large in relation to the total assets or the total shareholder equity of the licensee, determine that a licensee’s financing assistance to a single business or group of affiliated businesses violates (a) of this section or constitutes an unsafe or unsound act;

require that a licensee maintain a reserve in the amount of anticipated losses;

require that a licensee have in effect a written financing assistance policy approved by the licensee’s board of directors, including credit evaluation and other matters; the department may not require that a licensee adopt a financing assistance policy that contains standards that prevent the licensee from exercising needed flexibility in evaluating and structuring financing assistance to businesses on an individual basis.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.300.
Disclosure of potential conflict of interest.

A person shall disclose a potential conflict of interest that occurs in a transaction in the financing documents of the transaction or, if the transaction does not involve financing assistance, in another appropriate document, if the person

participates in a decision of a licensee relating to the transaction; and

knows of a potential conflict of interest involving the transaction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.310.
Terms and conditions where potential conflict of interest is involved.

If a licensee provides financing assistance to a business or engages in another business transaction, and if the assistance or transaction involves a potential conflict of interest, the terms and conditions under which the licensee provides the assistance or engages in the transaction may not be less favorable to the licensee than the terms and conditions that would be required by the licensee in the ordinary course of business if the assistance or transaction did not involve a potential conflict of interest.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)

Sec. 10.13.320.
Examples of potential conflicts of interest.

In AS

10.13.300

—

10.13.310

, licensee transactions that involve a potential conflict of interest include

providing financing assistance to a principal shareholder of the licensee, to a person controlled by a principal shareholder of the licensee, or to a director, officer, partner, relative, controlling person, or affiliate of a principal shareholder of the licensee;

providing financing assistance to a business to which one or more of the following provides or plans to provide contemporaneous financing assistance:

a principal shareholder of the licensee;

a director, officer, partner, relative, controlling person, or affiliate of a principal shareholder of a licensee;

an affiliate of a principal shareholder of a licensee; or

a person controlled by a principal shareholder of the licensee;

providing financing assistance to a business that has or is expected to have a substantial business relationship with another business that has a director, officer, or controlling person who is also

a director, officer, or controlling person of the licensee; or

the spouse of a director, officer, or controlling person of the licensee;

providing financing assistance to a business if the business, or a director, officer, or controlling person of the business contemporaneously has lent or will lend money to an associate of the licensee;

providing financing assistance for the purchase of property of an associate or principal shareholder of the licensee;

selling or otherwise transferring an asset of the licensee to an associate or principal shareholder of the licensee.

In this section, “relative” means a parent, child, sibling, spouse, grandparent, grandchild, nephew, niece, aunt, or uncle, or a relative of the same degree through marriage.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1992)